Massachusetts, session 194th, H2400.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 111 of the General Laws, as so appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by inserting after section 244 the following section:-
Section 245. (a) The department shall create a surveillance case definition for Long
COVID also known as post-acute sequelae of SARS-CoV-2 (PASC) that aligns with the
definition established by the National Academies of Sciences, Engineering, and Medicine
(NASEM) and the diverse associated conditions as described in it.
(b) The department shall determine the most effective and efficient method to conduct
active surveillance on the condition known as Long COVID (PASC) to better understand its
prevalence and impact on the Commonwealth’s population and health care systems and inform
public health interventions.
(c)The department shall develop a case report form to support these active surveillance
efforts. This case report form may collect the following information on patients diagnosed with
of 2

Long COVID (PASC): (i) gender identity, (ii) race, (iii) year of birth, (iv) county of residence,
(v) state of residence (vi) primary language, (vii) presenting symptom(s) or condition(s) allowing
for the diagnosis, (ix) date of initial infection with COVID-19, (x) date of onset of Long COVID
(PASC) symptoms, (xi) county of diagnosis. The case report form may collect information on
treatment received and referrals provided.
(d) The department shall commence active public health surveillance of Long COVID
(PASC) six months after enactment of this act. The department shall determine the frequency to
make statewide surveillance reports available to the public, no less than on an annual basis.
(e) Not later than one year after the enactment of this act the department shall provide a
report to the clerks of the house of representatives and the senate and to the chairs of the joint
committee on public health on the progress of the commonwealth’s Long COVID (PASC)
surveillance efforts. The report shall include the status of the development and dissemination of a
surveillance form, the department outreach and education on Long COVID (PASC) surveillance,
and initial surveillance results.
of 2